Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 9
Recycling

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-9-101. Policy.

It is the policy of the State of Arkansas to encourage and promote recycling in order to conserve natural resources, conserve energy, and preserve landfill space. In furtherance of this policy, the State of Arkansas adopts as a goal in the new century the recycling of forty percent (40%) of its municipal solid waste and forty-five percent (45%) of its municipal solid waste, as shall be determined by the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality by rule.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 2001, No. 94, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 682; 2019, No. 910, § 2854.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315, in the second sentence, deleted “by 2005” following the first occurrence of “solid waste”, deleted “by 2010” following the second occurrence of “solid waste”, and substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 inserted “or the Division of Environmental Quality”.

8-9-102. Construction.

The terms and provisions of this chapter are to be liberally construed so as to best achieve and effectuate the policies and purposes hereof.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1.

8-9-103. Conflict with federal laws.

If any provision of this chapter is found to conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this chapter is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and such finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1.

8-9-104. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

“Materials in the recycling process” means ferrous and nonferrous metals diverted or removed from the solid waste stream so that they may be reused, as long as:

Those materials are processed or handled using reasonably available processing equipment and control technology, as determined by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, taking cost into account; and

A substantial amount of the materials are consistently utilized to manufacture a product which otherwise would have been produced using virgin material;

“Municipal solid waste” means waste produced by individuals, public entities, agriculture, and businesses, including yard waste and waste not traditionally included in the recycling rate calculation and that is by its nature eligible for disposal in a municipal solid waste landfill;

“Person” means an individual, municipality, other governmental entity, or another entity recognized by law with rights and duties;

“Recyclable materials” or “recyclables” means those materials from the solid waste stream that can be recovered for reuse in present or reprocessed form;

“Recycling” means the systematic collection, sorting, decontaminating, and returning of waste materials to commerce as commodities for use or exchange;

“Solid waste” means the same as provided by § 8-6-702;

“Solid waste board” or “board” means a regional solid waste management board or its successor created under § 8-6-701 et seq.;

“Solid waste district” or “district” means a regional solid waste management district or its successor created under § 8-6-701 et seq.;

“Source separation” means the act or process of removing a particular type of recyclable material from the solid waste stream at the point of generation or at a point under control of the generator for the purpose of collection and recycling; and

“Yard waste” means grass clippings, leaves, and shrubbery trimmings.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1993, No. 479, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 110; 2001, No. 94, § 2; 2017, No. 1067, § 3; 2019, No. 693, § 32; 2019, No. 695, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2855, 2856.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment repealed former (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted the definition for “‘Recyclable materials collection center’ or ‘collection center’”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 695 added the definition for “Person”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted the definition for “Department”; and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (3)(A) [now (2)(A)].

8-9-105. Penalties and procedures.

Any person who violates any provision of § 8-9-301 et seq. or the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401 et seq., or of any rule or order issued pursuant to this chapter, shall be subject to the same penalty and enforcement provisions as are contained in § 8-6-204.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the procedure of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for issuance of rules, conduct of hearings, notice, power of subpoena, review of action on permits, right of appeal, presumptions, finality of actions, and related matters shall be as provided in §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106 and 8-4-201 — 8-4-229 of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq., including without limitation §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-210, 8-4-212 — 8-4-214, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229.

All rules adopted under this chapter shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1997, No. 179, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 683.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulation” following “rule” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b) and (c).

Subchapter 2
— Recycling Generally

Cross References.

Compliance Advisory Panel, §
8-4-314.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-9-201. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the State Marketing Board for Recyclables, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1067, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 50; 1997, No. 540, § 12; 1997, No. 1018, § 2; 1997, No. 1354, § 10; 1999, No. 1164, § 111; 1999, No. 1508, §§ 3, 7.

8-9-202. Powers and duties of the division.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall have the power and duty to:

Adopt reasonable rules to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter;

Promote public education and public awareness of the necessity of supporting waste reduction and recyclable material recovery as an integral part of all solid waste and recyclable materials programs in the state;

Provide, to the extent practicable, upon request, to state agencies, planning and technical assistance in carrying out their responsibilities under this subchapter; and

Implement, administer, and fund the collection and recycling or collection and disposal of extra-large tires as defined in § 8-9-402 with the advice and assistance of the Compliance Advisory Panel.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 2019, No. 177, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 684; 2019, No. 910, § 2857.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 177 added (4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “division” for “department” in the section heading; and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language.

8-9-203. Recycling by governmental entities.

Each state agency, state college or university, county, city, and public school, in cooperation with the Division of Environmental Quality and the Compliance Advisory Panel shall:

Establish a source separation and recycling program for recyclables generated as a result of agency operations;

Adopt procedures for collection and storage of recyclables; and

Make contractual or other arrangements for transportation and sale of recyclables.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any state agency, state college or university, county, city, or public school from engaging in, contracting for, or otherwise allowing or arranging for composting of yard waste on property owned or controlled by the governmental entity.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 2017, No. 1067, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2858.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Each” for “Beginning December 31, 1991, each” and “Compliance Advisory Panel” for “State Marketing Board for Recyclables”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a).

8-9-204. Purchasing of recyclables by governmental entities.

State agencies, cities, counties, and other governmental entities are encouraged to provide for preferential purchasing of products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1.

Subchapter 3
— Recyclable Items

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-9-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Label” means a molded, imprinted, or raised symbol on or near the bottom of a plastic product;

“Lead-acid battery” means a battery with a core of elemental lead and a capacity of six volts (6v) or more;

“Plastic” means any material made of polymeric organic compounds and additives that can be shaped by flow;

“Plastic bottle” means a plastic container intended for single use that has a neck that is smaller than the body of the container, accepts a screw-type or snap cap, or other closure and has a capacity of sixteen fluid ounces (16 fl. ozs.) or more but less than five gallons (5 gals.);

“Rigid plastic container” means any formed or molded container other than a bottle, intended for single use, composed predominantly of plastic resin, and having a relatively inflexible finite shape or form with a capacity of eight ounces (8 ozs.) or more but less than five gallons (5 gals.); and

“Single use” means filled one (1) time.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1993, No. 579, § 1.

8-9-302. Plastic container labeling.

Beginning July 1, 1992, a person shall not distribute, sell, or offer for sale in this state a plastic bottle or rigid plastic container unless the product is labeled with a code indicating the plastic resin used to produce the plastic bottle or rigid plastic container. Rigid plastic bottles or rigid plastic containers with labels and basecups of a different material shall be coded by their basic material.

The code shall consist of a number placed within a triangle of arrows and letters placed below the triangle of arrows. The triangle shall be equilateral, formed by three (3) arrows, with the apex of each point of the triangle at the midpoint of each arrow rounded with a short radius. The arrowhead of each arrow shall be at the midpoint of each side of the triangle with a short gap separating the pointer from the base of the adjacent arrow. The triangle, formed by the three (3) arrows curved at their midpoints, shall depict a clockwise path around the code number.

The numbers and letters used shall be as follows:

PETE (polyethylene terephthalate);

HDPE (high density polyethylene);

V (vinyl);

LDPE (low density polyethylene);

PP (polypropylene);

PS (polystyrene); and

OTHER.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall maintain a list of the label codes provided pursuant to this section and shall provide a copy of that list to any person upon request.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2859.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

8-9-303. Lead-acid batteries.

A person selling lead-acid batteries at retail or offering lead-acid batteries for retail sale in the state shall:

Accept, at the point of transfer, in a quantity at least equal to the number of new lead-acid batteries purchased, used lead-acid batteries from customers, if offered by customers; and

Post written notices which must be at least eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8½" x 11") in size and must contain the universal recycling symbol and the following language:

“It is illegal to discard a motor vehicle or marine battery.”;

“Recycle your used batteries.”;

“State law requires us to accept used lead-acid batteries for recycling, in exchange for new lead-acid batteries purchased.”; and

“When you purchase any new lead-acid battery, you will be charged an additional ten dollars ($10.00) unless you return a used lead-acid battery for refund within thirty (30) days.”

Each person who purchases a lead-acid battery at retail shall be assessed a surcharge of ten dollars ($10.00) per lead-acid battery by the retailer unless for each lead-acid battery purchased:

That person returns a used lead-acid battery to the retailer within thirty (30) days of the date of his or her surcharged purchase;

That person provides a valid police report which indicates that a lead-acid battery has been stolen from that person; or

The purchase is for installation in an item which was sold without a lead-acid battery and there is no used lead-acid battery for that item which could be returned, and that person signs a written statement containing the following language:

A retailer shall refund the ten-dollar surcharge to any purchaser of a new lead-acid battery who presents a used lead-acid battery to the retailer with a receipt for the purchase of a new lead-acid battery from that retailer within that thirty-day period.

A retailer may keep any lead-acid battery surcharge moneys which are not properly claimed within thirty (30) days after the date of sale.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall produce, print, and distribute the notices required by this section to all places where lead-acid batteries are offered for sale at retail.

In performing its duties under this section, the division may inspect any place, building, or premises governed by this section.

Any person selling new lead-acid batteries at wholesale shall accept, at the point of transfer, in a quantity at least equal to the number of new lead-acid batteries purchased, used lead-acid batteries from customers if offered by customers.

A person accepting lead-acid batteries in transfer from a lead-acid battery retailer shall be allowed a period not to exceed ninety (90) days to remove lead-acid batteries from the retail point of collection.

No person shall place a used lead-acid battery in municipal solid waste or discard or otherwise dispose of a lead-acid battery, except by delivery to:

A lead-acid battery retailer or wholesaler;

A collection or recycling facility authorized under the law of the State of Arkansas; or

A secondary lead smelter permitted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

No lead-acid battery retailer shall dispose of a used lead-acid battery except by delivery to the agent of a lead-acid battery wholesaler, to a battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter permitted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, or to a collection or recycling facility authorized under the law of the State of Arkansas or to a secondary lead smelter permitted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

An owner or operator of a solid waste landfill shall not knowingly accept for disposal a lead-acid battery.

Each lead-acid battery improperly disposed of or accepted for disposal shall constitute a separate violation.

“I attest that this purchase of a lead-acid battery is for installation in an item which was sold without a lead-acid battery, and there is no used battery for this item which can be returned.”

(j)

The requirements for retailers contained in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to a person whose retail sales of lead-acid batteries are not in the ordinary course of business.

(k)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the collection, transportation, or disposal of lead-acid batteries mixed or commingled with solid waste by any person engaged in the collection, transportation, or disposal of solid waste, unless it can be demonstrated that the person knew or should have known that such lead-acid batteries had been mixed or commingled with the solid waste collected, transported, or disposed of, and unless it can be demonstrated that it is economically and environmentally feasible to remove and recover the lead-acid batteries from the solid waste collected, transported, or disposed of.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1993, No. 579, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2860.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1 provided: “The provisions of this section shall apply beginning July 1, 1992.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d).

8-9-304. Used motor oil.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall adopt, after notice and public hearing, reasonable rules that are protective of the public health and environment for the collection, storage, and disposal, reuse, or recycling of used motor oil.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 685; 2019, No. 693, § 33.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “No later than December 31, 1992” from the beginning and substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted “No later than December 31, 1992” from the beginning and substituted “that are protective” for “which are protective”.

Subchapter 4
— Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act

Cross References.

Applicability of the Environmental Compliance Resource Act to this subchapter, § 8-6-2004.

Proceedings in circuit court, § 8-6-206.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 518, § 6: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that all solid waste districts do not have waste tire collection centers and waste tire processing facilities; that some waste tires must be transported across district lines for recycling and processing; that whole waste tires must be processed prior to transportation across district lines; that it is an undue hardship on those persons transporting whole waste tires to process them prior to delivery at a permitted processing facility; and that this act allows transportation of whole waste tires across district lines to a permitted processing facility. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1254, § 9: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to provide efficient and effective programs in the protection of the state's environment as mandated through the activities of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1999, No. 775, § 5: Mar. 22, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the law concerning the waste tire grant program is inadequate for the protection of the public. Regional Solid Waste Management Districts are dependent on adequate grant funding, which this bill would provide. Without adequate funding, the Districts' efforts to manage waste tires, which can result in a blight on the countryside and hazardous and unhealthy conditions, would be hindered. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-9-401. Title — Legislative intent — Findings.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act”.

The purpose of this subchapter is to:

Protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by setting and implementing standards to be followed in the hauling, collection, storage, and recycling or disposal of recyclable tires, waste tires, and used tires culled for resale;

Provide accountability and sustainability for used tire programs by requiring use of the electronic uniform used tire manifest system developed by the Division of Environmental Quality and business plans for used tire programs;

Equalize the application of fees for all tires removed from rims; and

Ensure that reimbursements for used tire programs are related to the overall used tire program goals.

The General Assembly finds that:

If not properly managed, used tires pose a potential threat to human health and safety and the environment because used tires:

Are a known breeding habitat for mosquitoes and other disease-transmitting vectors; and

Pose substantial fire hazards;

The state must have a used tire program for recyclable tires, waste tires, and used tires culled for resale that is accountable, effective, and efficient; and

The primary goal of the used tire program is to recycle or put to beneficial use as many used tires as possible.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2861.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Title — Legislative intent — Findings” for “Legislative intent” in the section heading; added
(a); designated the existing language as the introductory language of (b) and (b)(1); in (b)(1), substituted “collection, storage, and recycling or” for “storage, recycling, and”, inserted “recyclable tires”, and added “and used tires culled for resale”; added (b)(2) through (b)(4); and added (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(2).

8-9-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Beneficial use” means using a tire or part of a tire:

To make another product;

To make a component material of another product;

As a substitute for a commercial product or material; or

As a component to produce an alternative fuel for commercial purposes;

“Commercial generator” means a person who sells new tires or provides delivery of new tires as part of fleet services to any one (1) or more of the following:

A municipality;

A county;

A state agency;

A federal agency;

A school district;

A political subdivision of the state; or

A person who in the ordinary course of business buys tires in bulk for use on commercial vehicles.

“Commercial generator” does not include a tire retailer;

“Electronic uniform used tire manifest system” means an administrative method developed by the Division of Environmental Quality under § 8-9-407 that:

Primarily uses an electronic application for the submission and management of information related to the generation, collection, transportation, distribution, and recycling, disposal, or resale of each recyclable tire, waste tire, and used tire culled for resale regulated under this subchapter;

Secondarily may allow submission of used tire data that is manifested using an equivalent paper documentation; and

Records the origin, date of collection, date of transfer, quantity, type, transporter, and destination for each recyclable tire, waste tire, and used tire culled for resale regulated under this subchapter;

“Extra-large tire” means a tire that, due to its size or construction, is more difficult to process for recycling or disposal than a large tire and costs substantially more to process than a large tire.

“Extra-large tire” includes without limitation a tire used, capable of being used, or designed to be used on any of the following vehicles or equipment:

A skid steer loader;

Excavation equipment;

A farm implement, including without limitation a tractor;

A backhoe;

A road grader;

Industrial equipment;

A skidder; or

A heavy duty truck used off-road for mining.

“Extra-large tire” includes without limitation a wide-base tire or extra-wide single tire;

“Inter-district used tire program” means a program formed by agreement of two (2) or more regional solid waste management boards to pool resources of all regional solid waste management boards that are parties to the agreement for the administration of one (1) consolidated used tire program;

“Large tire” means a tire with a load rating of “F” or higher;

“Load rating” means the system of trade designations that identifies the weight-carrying capacity range of a tire;

“Operator” means a person who performs a function that:

Requires individual judgment; and

May directly affect the proper operation at one (1) or more of the following:

A tire collection center;

A tire processing facility;

A tire generator facility; or

A waste tire monofill.

“Operator” includes a person who performs a function at a waste tire site.

“Operator” does not include a person who exclusively exercises general administrative supervision;

“Owner” means a person who holds legal title to property where a tire collection center, tire processing facility, tire generator facility, waste tire monofill, waste tire site, or other waste tire facility exists;

“Person” means an individual, government entity, or any other entity that is recognized by law with rights and duties;

“Qualified entity” means an entity that demonstrates to the division that the entity has the capability, experience, and resources to operate and administer a used tire program in compliance with this subchapter;

“Recyclable tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire that is recycled because it is no longer repairable, reusable, or suitable for its original intended purpose;

“Recycle” means the systematic process of collecting, sorting, decontaminating, and returning waste materials to commerce as commodities for use, other beneficial use, or exchange;

“Small tire” means a tire that has a load rating lower than “F”.

“Small tire” includes a tire from any of the following vehicles:

An automobile;

A motorcycle; or

An all-terrain vehicle;

“Tire” means any one (1) or more of the following:

A continuous, ring-shaped, removable cover made of solid rubber, pneumatic rubber, or semipneumatic rubber that is installed around a wheel rim; or

Any other round piece of equipment that is attached or could be attached to a vehicle or aircraft and has a primary function of enabling surface mobility.

“Tire” does not include a solid wheel rim with an integral rubber covering or a tire used on a nonmotorized bicycle, golf cart, or lawn mower;

“Tire collection center” means a site where tires are collected from tire generators, tire transporters, or the public before being recycled or disposed of by a used tire program;

“Tire generator” means a person who:

Removes tires from rims for disposal or resale; or

Stores used tires on or in property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by that person.

“Tire generator” includes without limitation:

A tire retailer;

A tire wholesaler;

A tire transporter;

A tire manufacturer;

A manufacturer of retreaded tires;

A new car dealer;

A used car dealer;

An auto repair shop; or

A salvage yard.

“Tire generator” does not include a commercial generator;

“Tire manufacturer” means a manufacturing operation engaged in the final assembly of the basic components of a tire;

“Tire processing facility” means a site where equipment is used to cut, chip, grind, or otherwise alter used tires;

“Tire retailer” means any one (1) or more of the following:

A person who is in the business of selling new tires, used tires, or both new tires and used tires to the end consumer; or

A person who is in the business of or receives compensation for removing tires from rims.

“Tire retailer” does not include a person who sells tires to another person exclusively for the purpose of resale if the subsequent retail sale is subject to the fee imposed under § 8-9-404 or a commercial generator;

“Tire transporter” means a person who is in the business of or receives compensation for transferring used tires from one (1) location to another location for collection, storage, processing, recycling, disposal, reuse, or resale;

“Used tire” means a tire that meets one (1) or more of the following criteria:

Is repairable or retreadable for its original intended purpose;

Is reusable;

Is recyclable; or

Has been collected by a tire retailer or at a tire collection center operated under this subchapter.

“Used tire” includes without limitation a recyclable tire, waste tire, and used tire culled for resale.

“Used tire” does not include a tire being held for ninety (90) days or less for the purpose of retreading or repairing the tire;

“Used tire culled for resale” means a tire that is removed from the rim but is diverted from a tire collection center, tire processing facility, or tire transporter with the intention of selling for reuse;

“Used tire program” means a program that receives funding under this subchapter and is operated by:

A regional solid waste management board; or

An inter-district used tire program;

“Vehicle” means any piece of equipment that uses wheels for surface mobility;

“Waste tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire that is land disposed because it is no longer repairable, reusable, or suitable for its original intended purpose;

“Waste tire site” means a location where unpermitted used tires are accumulated, whether loosely stored, compacted and baled, or a combination of both loosely stored and compacted and baled.

“Waste tire site” does not include:

A location where only new tires are stored; or

A location that is authorized to store tires by the division or rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

“Waste tires originating from a tire manufacturer” means those new tires that originate from a tire assembly process and are determined by the tire manufacturer to be either defective or unfit for use on a vehicle; and

“Wide-base tire” or “extra-wide single tire” means a tire approximately four hundred fifty-five millimeters (455 mm) wide that is used on a vehicle in which the front axle load exceeds the load capacity of a truck tire.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 749, § 1; 1993, No. 518, § 1; 1995, No. 1315, § 1; 1997, No. 1292, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 112; 2003, No. 1304, § 1; 2011, No. 744, § 1; 2015, No. 840, § 1; 2017, No. 317, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 686; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2862-2864; 2019, No. 980, §§ 2-7.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “rating of ‘F’ ” for “rating of ‘E’ ” in (1); in (8), substituted “nineteen inches (19")” for “twenty inches (20")” and “rating of ‘F’ ” for “rating of ‘E’,” and added “including without limitation wide-base or extra-wide single tire”; and added (15).

The 2015 amendment redesignated former (10) as (10)(A); and added (10)(B).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (25)(B)(ii) [now (27)(B)(ii)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (3); and substituted “division” for “department” in (9) [now (11)] and (25)(B)(ii) [now (27)(B)(ii)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 980 inserted “under § 8-9-407” in the introductory language of (3); substituted “Primarily uses” for “Uses” in (3)(A); inserted (3)(B) and redesignated former (3)(B) as (3)(C); added (4)(C); rewrote (6); substituted “lower than ‘F’” for “of ‘F’ or lower and a rim size of nineteen inches (19") or smaller” in (12)(A) [now (14)(A)];
added the definitions for “Operator” and “Owner”; and made stylistic changes.